Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2974
Appointment and authority of officers.

(1) A limited cooperative association has the offices provided in its articles of organization or bylaws or established by the board of directors consistent with the articles of organization or bylaws.

(2) The articles of organization or bylaws or the board of directors shall designate one of the officers for preparing all records required by section 21-2910 for the authentication of records.

(3) Officers have the authority and shall perform the duties as the articles of organization or bylaws prescribe or as the board of directors determines is consistent with the articles of organization or bylaws.

(4) The election or appointment of an officer does not of itself create a contract with the officer.

(5) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws an individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 74.